Wisconsin, session 2025, SB330.
do enact as follows:SB330,13Section 1. 175.35 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB330,1,44175.35 (title) Purchase Waiting period for the purchase of handguns.SB330,25Section 2. 175.35 (2) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB330,2,56175.35 (2) (d) The Forty-eight hours have elapsed from the time that the 1firearms dealer has received an approval a confirmation number regarding the 2firearms restrictions record search under sub. (2g) (c) from the department of 3justice and the firearms dealer has not been notified that the person is prohibited 4under state or federal law from possessing a firearm or that the department needs 5an extension under sub. (2g) (c) 4. c.SB330,36Section 3. 175.35 (2g) (c) 4. c. of the statutes is amended to read:SB330,2,137175.35 (2g) (c) 4. c. If the search indicates that it is unclear whether the 8person is prohibited under state or federal law from possessing a firearm and the 9department needs more time than provided under sub. (2) (d) to make the 10determination, the department shall make every reasonable effort to determine 11whether the person is prohibited under state or federal law from possessing a 12firearm and notify the firearms dealer of the results as soon as practicable but no 13later than 5 working days after the search was requested.SB330,414Section 4. Initial applicability.SB330,2,1615(1) This act first applies to sales that occur on the effective date of this 16subsection.SB330,2,1717